apertium-mt-ar.ar.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>اأإآبتثجحخدذرزسشصضطظعغفقكلمنهويىءؤئ</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n"           c="Noun"/>
    <sdef n="pr"          c="Preposition"/>
    <sdef n="ij"          c="Interjection"/>
    <sdef n="abbr"        c="Abbreviation"/>
    <sdef n="rel"         c="Relative"/>
    <sdef n="prn"         c="Pronoun"/>
    <sdef n="det"         c="Determiner"/>
    <sdef n="np"          c="Proper noun"/>
    <sdef n="p1"          c="First person"/>
    <sdef n="p2"          c="Second person"/>
    <sdef n="p3"          c="Third person"/>
    
    <sdef n="aa"          c="Animate"/>
    <sdef n="nn"          c="Inanimate"/>

    <sdef n="m"           c="Masculine"/>
    <sdef n="f"           c="Feminine"/>
    <sdef n="mf"          c="Masculine / feminine"/>
    <sdef n="genacc"      c="Genitive / Accusative"/>


    <sdef n="nom"         c="Nominative"/>
    <sdef n="gen"         c="Genitive"/>
    <sdef n="acc"         c="Accusative"/>
    <sdef n="GD"          c="Gender to be determined"/>

    <sdef n="top"         c="Toponym"/>
    <sdef n="ant"         c="Anthroponym"/>
    <sdef n="cog"         c="Cognomen"/>
    <sdef n="al"          c="Altres"/>

    <sdef n="ord"         c="Ordinal"/>
    <sdef n="qnt"         c="Quantative"/>
    
    <sdef n="sg"          c="Singular"/>
    <sdef n="du"          c="Dual"/>
    <sdef n="pl"          c="Plural"/>
    <sdef n="sp"          c="Singular / plural"/>
    
    <sdef n="vblex"       c="Verb, lexical"/>
    <sdef n="vaux"	  c="Auxilliary verb"/>
    <sdef n="vmod"	  c="Modal verb"/>
    <sdef n="actv"	  c="Active voice"/>
    <sdef n="pasv"	  c="Passive voice"/>
    <sdef n="past"        c="Past tense"/>
    <sdef n="inf"         c="Infinitive"/>
    <sdef n="fut"         c="Future"/>
    <sdef n="pres"        c="Present"/>
    <sdef n="imp"         c="Imperative"/>
    <sdef n="pprs"        c="Active participle"/>
    <sdef n="pp"          c="Passive participle"/>

    <sdef n="indic"	  c="indicative"/>
    <sdef n="apocop"      c="apocopatus"/>
    <sdef n="subjun"      c="subiunctivus"/>
    <sdef n="neg"         c="negation"/>

    <sdef n="tv"	  c="transitive"/>
    <sdef n="iv"          c="intransitive"/>
    <sdef n="TD"          c="transitivity to be determined"/>

    <sdef n="cons"        c="Noun"/>
    <sdef n="px1sg"       c="Noun"/>
    <sdef n="px1pl"       c="Noun"/>
    <sdef n="px2sg_m"     c="Noun"/>
    <sdef n="px2sg_f"     c="Noun"/>
    <sdef n="px2pl_m"     c="Noun"/>
    <sdef n="px2pl_f"     c="Noun"/>
    <sdef n="px2du"       c="Noun"/> 
    <sdef n="px3sg_m"     c="Noun"/>
    <sdef n="px3sg_f"     c="Noun"/>
    <sdef n="px3pl_m"     c="Noun"/>
    <sdef n="px3pl_f"     c="Noun"/>
    <sdef n="px3du"       c="Noun"/>     

    <sdef n="subj"        c="Subject"/>
    <sdef n="obj"         c="Object"/>
    <sdef n="def"         c="Definite"/>
    <sdef n="dem"         c="Demonstrative"/>
    <sdef n="ind"         c="Indefinite"/>
    <sdef n="pos"         c="Possesive"/>
    <sdef n="itg"         c="Interrogative"/>
    <sdef n="num"         c="Numeral"/>
    <sdef n="adv"         c="Adverb"/>
    <sdef n="adj"         c="Adjective"/>
    <sdef n="cnjcoo"      c="Co-ordinating conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub"      c="Sub-ordinating conjunction"/>
    <sdef n="cnjadv"      c="Adverbial conjunction"/>

    <sdef n="cm"          c="Comma"/>
    <sdef n="sent"        c="Sentence marker"/>
  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>

    <!-- SECTION: Punctuation -->

    <pardef n="separa">
      <e><re>[.:!]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="sent"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>؟</l><r>؟<s n="sent"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>?</l><r>؟<s n="sent"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>؛</l><r>؛<s n="sent"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>;</l><r>؛<s n="sent"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="coma">
      <e><p><l>،</l><r>،<s n="cm"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="urls">
    <e>
      <re>(http://|https://|ftp://)?[áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9](([\-_])?[áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9])*(.[áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9](([\-_])?[áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9])*)*(.[a-z][a-z]|.aero|.asia|.biz|.cat|.com|.coop|.edu|.gov|.info|.int|.jobs|.mil|.mobi|.museum|.name|.net|.org|.pro|.tel|.travel)(/([áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9\-_\?=&amp;\*,]+(.[áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9\-_\?=&amp;\*,]+)*/)*([áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9\-_\?=&amp;\*,]+(.[áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9\-_\?=&amp;\*,]+)*)?)?</re><p><l></l> <r><s n="num"/></r> </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="numeros">
      <e><re>(Lm|€|£) ?.?[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)? ?%</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><i>-</i><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?%?</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?[:.][0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?[:.][0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)? ?(a|p|A|P).?(m|M).?</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="S__فتح/ه">
      <e><p><l>ه</l><r><j/>ه<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ها</l><r><j/>ه<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ك</l><r><j/>ه<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ك</l><r><j/>ه<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ني</l><r><j/>ه<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>هما</l><r><j/>ه<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>كما</l><r><j/>ه<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>هم</l><r><j/>ه<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>هن</l><r><j/>ه<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>كم</l><r><j/>ه<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>كن</l><r><j/>ه<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>نا</l><r><j/>ه<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="S__يلون/ه">
      <e><p><l>ه</l><r><j/>ه<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ها</l><r><j/>ه<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ك</l><r><j/>ه<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ك</l><r><j/>ه<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ي</l><r><j/>ه<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>هما</l><r><j/>ه<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>كما</l><r><j/>ه<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="du"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>هم</l><r><j/>ه<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>هن</l><r><j/>ه<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>كم</l><r><j/>ه<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>كن</l><r><j/>ه<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ا</l><r><j/>ه<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e><par n="separa"/></e>
    <e><par n="coma"/></e>
    <e><par n="numeros"/></e>
    <e><par n="urls"/></e>
<e><p><l>تبرمو</l><r>برم<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__فتح/ه"/></e>
<e><p><l>تكرما</l><r>كرم<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="actv"/><s n="subjun"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="du"/></r></p><par n="S__فتح/ه"/></e>
<e><p><l>قطعتما</l><r>قطع<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="actv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="du"/></r></p><par n="S__فتح/ه"/></e>
<e><p><l>ترفضن</l><r>رفض<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__فتح/ه"/></e>
<e><p><l>ارجعن</l><r>رجع<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="actv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__فتح/ه"/></e>
<e><p><l>يشغلو</l><r>شغل<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="actv"/><s n="apocop"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__فتح/ه"/></e>
<e><p><l>أصدع</l><r>صدع<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="actv"/><s n="subjun"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__فتح/ه"/></e>
<e><p><l>نجن</l><r>جن<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="apocop"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__فتح/ه"/></e>
<e><p><l>يعذر</l><r>عذر<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__فتح/ه"/></e>
<e><p><l>تشارك</l><r>شارك<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="actv"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__فتح/ه"/></e>
<e><p><l>يكتب</l><r>كتب<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="actv"/><s n="subjun"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__فتح/ه"/></e>
<e><p><l>ينقلن</l><r>نقل<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="actv"/><s n="subjun"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__فتح/ه"/></e>
<e><p><l>تشربا</l><r>شرب<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="actv"/><s n="apocop"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="du"/></r></p><par n="S__فتح/ه"/></e>
<e><p><l>لونت</l><r>لون<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="actv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__فتح/ه"/></e>
<e><p><l>تكتشف</l><r>اكتشف<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="actv"/><s n="apocop"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__فتح/ه"/></e>
<e><p><l>أدهن</l><r>دهن<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="actv"/><s n="subjun"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__يلون/ه"/></e>
<e><p><l>ندهن</l><r>دهن<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="actv"/><s n="subjun"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__يلون/ه"/></e>
<e><p><l>ادهن</l><r>دهن<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="actv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__يلون/ه"/></e>
<e><p><l>يدهن</l><r>دهن<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="actv"/><s n="subjun"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__يلون/ه"/></e>
<e><p><l>تدهن</l><r>دهن<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="actv"/><s n="subjun"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__يلون/ه"/></e>
<e><p><l>تدهن</l><r>دهن<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="actv"/><s n="subjun"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__يلون/ه"/></e>
<e><p><l>يعدا</l><r>عد<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="apocop"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="du"/></r></p><par n="S__فتح/ه"/></e>
<e><p><l>قتلتما</l><r>قتل<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="actv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="du"/></r></p><par n="S__فتح/ه"/></e>
<e><p><l>نشرت</l><r>نشر<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="actv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__فتح/ه"/></e>
<e><p><l>تنظما</l><r>نظم<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="actv"/><s n="apocop"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="du"/></r></p><par n="S__فتح/ه"/></e>
<e><p><l>أدفن</l><r>دفن<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="actv"/><s n="subjun"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__يلون/ه"/></e>
<e><p><l>ندفن</l><r>دفن<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="actv"/><s n="subjun"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__يلون/ه"/></e>
<e><p><l>دفنت</l><r>دفن<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="actv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__فتح/ه"/></e>
<e><p><l>ادفن</l><r>دفن<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="actv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__يلون/ه"/></e>
<e><p><l>يدفن</l><r>دفن<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="actv"/><s n="subjun"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__يلون/ه"/></e>
<e><p><l>تدفن</l><r>دفن<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="actv"/><s n="subjun"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__يلون/ه"/></e>
<e><p><l>تدفن</l><r>دفن<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="actv"/><s n="subjun"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="S__يلون/ه"/></e>
<e><p><l>مارستن</l><r>مارس<s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="actv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="S__فتح/ه"/></e>
